nb: Forretninger og industri > Medisinsk > Medisinsk forbruksmateriell > Medisinske nåler og sprøyter: Sett med medisinske nåler og sprøyter; Medisinske nåler; Medisinske sprøyter
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 醫療業 > 醫療用品 > 醫療用針/注射筒: 醫療針頭和注射器組合; 醫療針頭; 醫療注射器
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Lääketiede > Lääketieteelliset tarvikkeet > Injektioneulat ja -ruiskut: Injektioneula- ja -ruiskupakkaukset; Injektioneulat; Injektioruiskut
sv: Företag och industri > Sjukvård > Medicinska förbrukningsartiklar > Medicinska nålar och sprutor: Set med medicinska nålar och injektionssprutor; Medicinska nålar; Medicinska injektionssprutor
es: Economía e industria > Productos médicos > Material médico > Agujas y jeringas médicas: Juegos de agujas y jeringas médicas; Agujas médicas; Jeringas médicas
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Medicina > Suprimentos médicos > Seringas e agulhas médicas: Kits de agulhas e seringas médicas; Agulhas médicas; Seringas médicas
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Ιατρικά είδη > Ιατρικές προμήθειες > Ιατρικές βελόνες & σύριγγες: Σετ ιατρικών βελονών & συρίγγων; Ιατρικές βελόνες; Ιατρικές σύριγγες
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 医疗 > 医疗用品 > 医疗注射器: 医用针头和注射器套装; 医用针头; 医用注射器
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Y tế > Trang thiết bị y tế > Bơm kim tiêm y tế: Bộ kim tiêm & ống tiêm y tế; Kim tiêm y tế; Ống tiêm y tế
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Медицински > Медицински консумативи > Медицински игли и спринцовки: Комплекти медицински игли и спринцовки; Медицински игли; Медицински спринцовки
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Медицина > Медицинские расходные материалы > Медицинские иглы и шприцы: Медицинские шприцы в комплекте с иглами; Медицинские иглы; Медицинские шприцы
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 의료 > 의료 용품 > 의료용 바늘/주사기: 의료용 바늘 & 주사기 세트; 의료용 바늘; 의료용 주사기
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Médico > Artigos médicos > Agulhas e seringas médicas: Conjuntos de agulhas e seringas médicas; Agulhas médicas; Seringas médicas
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Sectorul medical > Articole medicale > Ace și seringi medicale: Seturi de ace și seringi medicale; Ace chirurgicale; Seringi medicale
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Zdravstvo > Medicinska oprema > Medicinske igle in brizge: Kompleti medicinskih igel in brizg; Medicinske igle; Medicinske brizge
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Branża medyczna > Medyczne materiały eksploatacyjne > Igły i strzykawki medyczne: Zestawy igieł i strzykawek medycznych; Igły medyczne; Strzykawki medyczne
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Medikal > Medikal Sarf Malzemeleri > Tıbbi İğneler ve Şırıngalar: Tıbbi İğne ve Şırınga Setleri; Tıbbi İğneler; Tıbbi Şırıngalar
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > การแพทย์ > อุปกรณ์การแพทย์ > เข็มและกระบอกฉีดยา: ชุดเข็มฉีดยาและกระบอกฉีดยาทางการแพทย์; เข็มฉีดยาทางการแพทย์; กระบอกฉีดยาทางการแพทย์
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Medicina > Medicinske potrepštine > Medicinske igle i šprice: Setovi medicinskih igala i šprica; Medicinske igle; Medicinske šprice
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Orvosi > Orvosi kellékek > Orvosi tűk és fecskendők: Orvosi tű- és fecskendőkészletek; Orvosi tűk; Orvosi fecskendők
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Medizinischer Bereich > Medizinischer Bedarf > Nadeln & Spritzen: Medizinische Kanülen- und Spritzensets; Medizinische Kanülen; Medizinische Spritzen
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Zdravotníctvo > Zdravotnícky materiál > Zdravotnícke ihly a striekačky: Súpravy zdravotníckych ihiel a striekačiek; Zdravotnícke ihly; Zdravotnícke striekačky
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Secteur médical > Matériel médical > Aiguilles et seringues médicales: Jeux d’aiguilles et de seringues médicales; Aiguilles médicales; Seringues médicales
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 医療 > 医療用品 > 注射器・注射針: 医療用針・注射器のセット; 医療用針; 医療用注射器
it: Commercio e industria > Medicina > Prodotti medici > Aghi e siringhe: Set aghi e siringhe; Aghi medici; Siringhe mediche
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Medisch > Medische benodigdheden > Naalden en injectiespuiten: Medische sets naalden en injectiespuiten; Medische naalden; Medische injectiespuiten
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Zdravotnictví > Zdravotnické potřeby > Zdravotnické jehly a stříkačky: Sady injekčních jehel a stříkaček; Injekční jehly; Injekční stříkačky
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Medicina > Medicinos reikmenys > Medicininės adatos ir švirkštai: Medicininių adatų ir švirkštų rinkiniai; Medicininės adatos; Medicininiai švirkštai
en: Business & Industrial > Medical > Medical Supplies > Medical Needles & Syringes: Medical Needle & Syringe Sets; Medical Needles; Medical Syringes
da: Erhverv og industri > Medicinsk > Medicinsk tilbehør > Nåle og sprøjter: Sæt med medicinale nål og sprøjte; Medicinale nåle; Medicinale sprøjter